test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-even-o_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - asto: # o-stems
    asto+N+Sg+Nom: asto
    asto+N+Sg+Gen: asto
    asto+N+Sg+Acc: asto
    asto+N+Sg+Ill: aaston
    asto+N+Sg+Loc: astoost
    asto+N+Sg+Com: astoin
    asto+N+Sg+Abe: astottáá
    asto+N+Ess: aston
    asto+N+Par: astod
    asto+N+Pl+Nom: astoh
    asto+N+Pl+Gen: astoi
    asto+N+Pl+Acc: astoid
    asto+N+Pl+Ill: astoid
    asto+N+Pl+Loc: astoin
    asto+N+Pl+Com: astoiguin
    asto+N+Pl+Abe: astoittáá
 
 
  Noun - cijkko: # o-stems
    cijkko+N+Sg+Nom: cijkko
    cijkko+N+Sg+Gen: cijho
    cijkko+N+Sg+Ill: ciijkon
    cijkko+N+Sg+Loc: cijhoost
    cijkko+N+Sg+Com: cijhhoin
    cijkko+N+Ess: cijkkon
    cijkko+N+Par: cijkkod
    cijkko+N+Pl+Nom: cijhoh
    cijkko+N+Pl+Gen: cijhoi
    cijkko+N+Pl+Acc: cijhoid
    cijkko+N+Pl+Ill: cijhhoid
    cijkko+N+Pl+Loc: cijhoin
    cijkko+N+Pl+Com: cijhoiguin
    cijkko+N+Pl+Abe: cijhoittáá
 
 
  Noun - ito: # o-stems 
    ito+N+Sg+Nom: ito
    ito+N+Sg+Gen: iđo
    ito+N+Sg+Acc: iđo
    ito+N+Sg+Ill: iton
    ito+N+Sg+Loc: iiđoost
    ito+N+Sg+Com: iđoin
    ito+N+Sg+Abe: iđottáá
    ito+N+Ess: ittoon
    ito+N+Par: ittood
    ito+N+Pl+Nom: iđoh
    ito+N+Pl+Gen: iđoi
    ito+N+Pl+Acc: iđoid
    ito+N+Pl+Ill: iđoid
    ito+N+Pl+Loc: iiđoin
    ito+N+Pl+Com: iđoiguin
    ito+N+Pl+Abe: iđoittáá
    
  
  Noun - millo: # o-stems
    millo+N+Sg+Nom: millo
    millo+N+Sg+Gen: milo
    millo+N+Sg+Acc: milo
    millo+N+Sg+Ill: miilon
    millo+N+Sg+Loc: milloost
    millo+N+Sg+Com: milloin
    millo+N+Pl+Abe: milottáá
    millo+N+Ess: millon
    millo+N+Par: millod
    millo+N+Pl+Nom: miloh
    millo+N+Pl+Gen: miloi
    millo+N+Pl+Acc: miloid
    millo+N+Pl+Ill: miloid
    millo+N+Pl+Loc: miloin
    millo+N+Pl+Com: miloiguin
    millo+N+Pl+Abe: miloittáá
